Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Financial Matters

6-35-301. Collection of taxes.

The city manager or administrative personnel appointed by the city manager shall make use of every method provided by general law to ensure the collection of taxes due the city, and shall also be authorized to use and shall use, if necessary, the methods now available to cities organized under the uniform city manager-commission charter, §§ 6-22-110 — 6-22-115.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.09; T.C.A., § 6-3508.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-35-302. Administration of finances.

The city manager or an officer appointed by the city manager shall have charge of the administration of the financial affairs of the city. There shall be maintained such accounting controls over the finances of the city and such financial reports as may be required by this charter, by ordinance, or by the manager. The manager shall provide for the auditing, approving and payment of all claims against the city.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.10; T.C.A., § 6-3509.

6-35-303. Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of the city shall begin on July 1 and shall end on June 30 of the succeeding year, but another fiscal year may be fixed by ordinance for the entire city government or for any utility.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.11; T.C.A., § 6-3510.

6-35-304. Preparation and contents of budget.

On or before a date fixed by the council, but not later than ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the manager shall submit to the council a proposed budget for the next fiscal year.

The budget shall present a complete financial plan for the ensuing year, including at least the following information:

Detailed estimates of all proposed expenditures for each department, board, office or other agency of the city, showing in addition the expenditures for corresponding items for the last preceding fiscal year, appropriations and anticipated expenditures for the current fiscal year, and reasons for recommended departures from the current expenditure pattern;

Statements of the bonded and other indebtedness of the city, including the debt redemption and interest requirements, the debt authorized and unissued, and the condition of the sinking funds;

Detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues of the city from all sources, including current and delinquent taxes, nontax revenues and proceeds from the sale of any bonds, with a comparative statement of the amounts received by the city from each of such sources for the last preceding fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the coming fiscal year;

A statement of the estimated balance or deficit, as of the end of the current fiscal year; and

Such other supporting schedules as the council may request, or are otherwise required by law.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.12; T.C.A., § 6-3511.

6-35-305. Capital budget program.

As a part of the annual budget, the city shall include a statement of pending capital projects and proposed new capital projects, relating the respective amounts proposed to be raised therefor by appropriations in the budget and the respective amounts, if any, proposed to be raised therefor by the issuance of bonds during the fiscal year. The city manager shall also include in the message, or attach thereto, a program of proposed capital projects for the five (5) fiscal years next succeeding the budget year, prepared by the planning commission, together with the city manager's comments thereon and any estimate of costs.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.13; T.C.A., § 6-3512.

6-35-306. Public hearing on budget — Budget as public record — Distribution.

A public hearing on the budget shall be held before its final adoption by the council, at such time and place as the council shall direct, and notice of such public hearing shall be published ten (10) days in advance of the date of the hearing. All persons present shall be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard for or against the estimates of any item in the budget.

The budget and budget message and all supporting schedules shall be a public record in the office of the city clerk, open to public inspection by anyone.

The city manager shall cause sufficient copies of the budget and budget message to be prepared for distribution to interested persons at least ten (10) days before the hearing.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.14; T.C.A., § 6-3513.

6-35-307. Adoption of appropriation ordinance.

Before the beginning of the next fiscal year, the council shall adopt an appropriation ordinance, based on the city manager's budget with such modifications as the council considers necessary or desirable; provided, that modifications in the school budget as submitted by the board of education shall be subject to the limitations of § 6-36-113.

Appropriations need not be in more detail than a lump sum for each fund.

The council shall not make any appropriations in excess of estimated revenue, except to provide for an actual emergency threatening the health, property or lives of the inhabitants of the city and declared by a unanimous vote of all members of the council present, when there is a quorum.

If for any reason an appropriation ordinance is not adopted prior to the beginning of the next fiscal year, the appropriations for the last fiscal year shall become the appropriations for the next fiscal year, until the adoption of the new appropriation ordinance.

The appropriation ordinance, insofar as it relates to the appropriation for schools, shall be further subject to § 6-36-114.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.15; T.C.A., § 6-3514.

6-35-308. Amendment to appropriation ordinance.

Amendments may be made to the original appropriation at any time during a current fiscal year after a public hearing before the council on five (5) days' notice published once in the official city newspaper; provided, that increased appropriations may be made only after the city manager has certified in writing that a sufficient amount of unappropriated revenue will be available, except for emergency appropriations as provided in § 6-35-307.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.16; T.C.A., § 6-3515.

6-35-309. Unexpended appropriation to lapse.

Any portion of an annual appropriation remaining unexpended and unencumbered at the close of a fiscal year shall lapse and be credited to the general fund, except that any balance remaining in any other fund at the end of a fiscal year may remain to the credit of that fund and be subject to further appropriation.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.17; T.C.A., § 6-3516.

6-35-310. Budget control.

At the beginning of each quarterly period during the fiscal year, and more often if required by the council, the manager shall submit to the council data showing the relation between the estimated and actual revenues and expenditures to date. If it shall appear that the revenues are less than anticipated, the council may reduce the appropriations, as prescribed in § 6-35-308, except amounts required for debt and interest charges, and with the further exception that reductions in school appropriation shall be as to total amount only, to such a degree as may be necessary to keep expenditures within the receipts. The manager may provide for monthly or quarterly allotments of appropriations to all departments, agencies or activities within the manager's jurisdiction under such rules as the manager shall prescribe, and make transfers between departments, agencies, or activities within each fund, and when authorized by the city council, from one (1) fund to another; provided, that any transfer of moneys from the city school fund to any other fund shall be made only with the concurrence of the board of education.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.18; T.C.A., § 6-3517.

6-35-311. Annual audit.

At the end of each fiscal year, an audit shall be made of the accounts and funds of the city covering the operations of the past fiscal year, by a certified public accountant selected by the council. The council may employ certified public accountants to audit all or any of its accounts and funds at the time it takes office or at any time it may deem expedient to assure correctness thereof.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.21; T.C.A., § 6-3520.

6-35-312. Fees.

All fees received in handling city business by any officer or employee shall belong to the city and shall be paid promptly into the city treasury, except fees received by school officers and employees, which shall be paid into the city school fund.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.22; T.C.A., § 6-3521.

6-35-313. Depositories of municipal funds.

The council, at a regular meeting, shall adopt a resolution to contract with a bank or banks making the best proposal to become the depository of municipal funds.

Before entering into a contract under subdivision (a)(1), the city manager or an officer appointed by the city manager shall review and analyze the proposals from the banks and submit an analysis of the proposals to each member of the council at or before the next meeting of the council. The analysis of the proposals should consider the bank or banks proposing the highest interest rate, potential service charges or other fees, factors affecting safety and liquidity of municipal funds, and any other relevant factors.

The council shall require any bank that becomes a depository of municipal funds to secure the funds by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, at least once every four (4) years, the city manager or an officer appointed by the city manager shall reevaluate the contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (a). The city manager or an officer appointed by the city manager shall base its evaluation on proposals obtained from at least two (2) banks. The city manager or an officer appointed by the city manager shall prepare a written evaluation of the proposals and preserve the evaluations for at least three (3) years.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.23; T.C.A., § 6-3522; Acts 1994, ch. 752, § 6; 2019, ch. 277, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “(a) The council shall designate a commercial bank or banks as depository or depositories for city funds and shall provide for the regular deposit of all city moneys.“(b) The council shall require any city funds deposited with a financial institution to be secured by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits, under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 277, § 5. July 1, 2019.

6-35-314. Financial records of utilities.

Separate financial and accounting records shall be maintained for each utility in accordance with accepted principles of utility accounting and as may be required by the city council, without impairing the authority of the city to manage and operate the utilities with the same personnel and equipment.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.35; T.C.A., § 6-3535.

6-35-315. Annual operating budget — Publication — Budgetary comparison.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governing body shall publish the annual operating budget and budgetary comparisons of the proposed budget with the prior year's actual figures and the current year's estimated figures, which information shall include the following:

Revenues and expenditures for the following governmental funds: general, streets/public works, general purpose school and debt service;

Revenues for each fund shall be listed separately by local taxes, state of Tennessee, federal government and other sources;

Expenditures for each fund shall be listed separately by salaries and other costs;

Beginning and ending fund balances shall be shown for each fund; and

The number of full-time equivalent employee positions shall be shown for each fund.

The publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation and shall be published not less than ten (10) days prior to the meeting where the governing body will consider final passage of the budget.

Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 10; 1992, ch. 760, § 6.